California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(10) Providing to employees transportation services which are required as part of the employer’s business activities to the extent that the transportation would be provided by employees without reimbursement in the absence of an employer-sponsored ridesharing incentive program. The capital costs of providing this service shall not be an eligible deduction under this section.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Employer” means either of the following:

(A) A taxpayer for whom services are performed by employees, except entities which are not subject to tax under this part.

(B) A taxpayer which is a private or public educational institution which enrolls students at higher than the secondary level.

(2) “Employee” means either of the following:

(A) An individual who performs service for an employer for more than eight hours per week for remuneration.

(B) Any commuting student, as defined in paragraph (3).

(3) “Commuting student” means a registered full-time student at a college, university, or other postsecondary educational institution, who lives apart from the property which is designated as the “employment site” for the purpose of this section, and who travels between his or her residence and the designated employment site on a regular, though not necessarily
 daily, basis.

(4) “Employer-sponsored ridesharing incentive program” means a program undertaken by an employer either alone or in cooperation with other employers to encourage or provide, or both, fiscal other incentives to employees to make the home-to-work commute trip by any mode other than the single-occupant motor vehicle. 

(5) “Company commuter bus or van” means a highway vehicle which meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Has at least seven or more persons commuting on a daily basis to and from work.

(B) At least 50 percent of the mileage of which can be reasonably expected to be used for the purpose of transporting employees to and from work.

(C) Is acquired by the taxpayer on
 or after the date of enactment of this legislation.

(6) “Vanpool” means seven or more persons commuting on a daily basis to and from work by means of a vehicle with a seating arrangement designed to carry 7 to 15 adult persons.

(7) “Monthly transit pass” means any bulk purchase of transit rides that entitles the purchaser to 40 or more rides per month, whether at a discount rate or the base fare rate.

(8) “Transit” means transportation service for use by the general public that utilizes buses, railcars, or ferries with a seating capacity of 16 or more persons.

(9) “Subscription taxipool” means a type of service in which employers or groups of employees contract with a public or private taxi operator to provide daily commuter service for a group of
 preassembled subscribers on a prepaid or daily-fare basis, following a relatively fixed route and schedule tailored to meet the needs of the subscribers.

(10) “Ridesharing arrangement” means the transportation of persons in a motor vehicle where that transportation is incidental to another purpose of the driver. The term includes ridesharing arrangements known as carpools, vanpools, and buspools.

(11) “Carpool” means two or more persons commuting on a daily basis to and from work by means of a vehicle with a seating arrangement designed to carry less than seven adults, including the driver.

(12) “Buspool” means 16 or more persons commuting on a daily basis to and from work by means of a vehicle with a seating arrangement designed to carry more than 15 adult passengers.

(13) “Private commuter bus” means a highway vehicle which meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Has a seating capacity of at least seven adults, including the driver.

(B) At least 50 percent of the mileage of which can be reasonably expected to be used for the purpose of transporting employees to and from work.

(C) Is acquired by the taxpayer on or after the date of enactment of this section.

(D) With respect to which the taxpayer makes an election under this paragraph on its return for the taxable year in which the vehicle is placed in service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 123.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24343.7.

Section 162(k)(2)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 35, Sec. 48.   Effective May 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

24343.8.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, a deduction shall not be allowed for the amount of any fine or penalty paid or incurred by an owner of all or part of a professional sports franchise, where that fine or penalty is assessed or imposed by the professional sports league that includes that franchise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 792, Sec. 2.   (AB 877)   Effective September 29, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

24344.

(a) Section 163 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to interest, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) If income of the taxpayer which is derived from or attributable to sources within this state is determined pursuant to Section 25101 or 25110, the interest deductible shall be an amount equal to interest income subject to apportionment by formula, plus the amount, if any, by which the balance of interest expense exceeds interest and dividend income (except dividends deductible under Section 24402 and dividends subject to the deductions provided for in Section 24411 to the extent of those deductions) not subject to apportionment by
 formula. Interest expense not included in the preceding sentence shall be directly offset against interest and dividend income (except dividends deductible under Section 24402 and dividends subject to the deductions provided for in Section 24411 to the extent of those deductions) not subject to apportionment by formula.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) and subject to paragraph (2), interest expense allowable under Section 163 of the Internal Revenue Code that is incurred for purposes of foreign investments may be offset against dividends deductible under Section 24411.

(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1997, the amount of interest computed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be multiplied by the same percentage used to determine the dividend
 deduction under Section 24411 to determine that amount of interest that may be offset as provided in paragraph (1).

(d) Section 7210(b) of Public Law 101-239, relating to the effective date for limitation on deduction for certain interest paid to a related person, shall apply.

(e) Section 163(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the limitation on business interest, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 89.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24344.5.

(a) A deduction, determined in accordance with Section 163(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be allowed to the issuer of an original issue discount bond.

(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, and before the taxable year in which the debt obligation matures or is sold, exchanged, or otherwise disposed, the amount deductible under this part shall be the same as the amount deductible on the federal tax return.

(c) The difference between the amount deductible on the federal tax return and the amount allowable under this part, with respect to obligations issued after December 31, 1984, for taxable years beginning before January 1, 1987, shall be allowed as a deduction in the taxable year in which the debt obligation matures or is sold, exchanged, or otherwise disposed.

(d) The provisions of Section 7202(c) of Public Law 101-239, relating to the effective date for treatment of certain high yield original issue discount obligations, shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 126.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24344.7.

The amendments to Section 163 of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section 13228 of the Revenue Reconciliation Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-66), relating to modification to limitation on deduction for certain interest, shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 127.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24345.

A deduction shall be allowed for taxes or licenses paid or accrued during the taxable year, except:

(a) Taxes paid to the state under this part.

(b) Taxes on or according to or measured by income or profits paid or accrued within the taxable year imposed by the authority of any of the following:

(1) The Government of the United States or any foreign country.

(2) Any state, territory, county, school district, municipality, or other taxing subdivision of any state or territory. 

(c) Taxes assessed against local benefits of a kind tending to increase the value of the property assessed, but this does not exclude the allowance as a deduction of so much of the taxes assessed against local benefits as is properly allocable to maintenance or interest charges. Nor does this exclude the allowance of any irrigation or other water district taxes or assessments which are levied for the payment of the principal of any improvement or other bonds for which a general assessment on all lands within the district is levied as distinguished from a special assessment levied on part of the area within the district.

(d) Federal stamp taxes (not described in subdivision (b) or (c)); but this
 subdivision shall not prevent such taxes from being deducted under Section 24343 (relating to trade or business expenses).

(e) State and local general sales or use taxes. However, there shall be allowed as a deduction, state and local sales or use taxes which are paid or accrued within the taxable year in carrying on a trade or business or an activity described in Section 212 of the Internal Revenue Code (relating to expenses for production of income). Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, any sales or use tax (except where a tax credit is claimed under Section 23612.2) which is paid or accrued by the taxpayer in connection with an acquisition or disposition of property shall be treated as part of the cost of the acquired property or, in the case of a disposition, as a reduction in the amount realized on the disposition.

(f) For purposes of subdivision (b), “taxes on or
 according to or measure by income” shall include any taxes imposed on a dividend that is eliminated from the income of the recipient under Section 25106.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 128.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24345.5.

A deduction shall not be allowed for the fee imposed by subsection (a) of Section 9008 of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 359, Sec. 31.   (AB 154)   Effective September 30, 2015.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

24345.6.

A deduction shall not be allowed for the excise tax imposed by Section 4501 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to repurchase of corporate stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 90.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24345.7.

A deduction shall not be allowed for the excise tax imposed by Section 5000D of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to designated drugs during noncompliance periods.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 91.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24346.

(a) For purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 24345, if real property is sold during any real property tax year, then—

(1) So much of the real property tax as is properly allocable to that part of the year which ends on the day before the date of the sale shall be treated as a tax imposed on the seller; and

(2) So much of that tax as is properly allocable to that part of the year which begins on the date of the sale shall be treated as a tax imposed on the purchaser.

(b) (1) In the case of any sale of real property; if—(A) A corporation may not, by reason of its method of accounting, deduct any amount for taxes unless paid; and(B) The other party to the sale is (under the law imposing the real property tax) liable for the real property tax for the real property tax year;then for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 24345 the corporation shall be treated as having paid, on the date of the
 sale, so much of the tax as, under subdivision (a), is treated as imposed on the corporation. For purposes of the preceding sentence, if neither party is liable for the tax, then the party holding the property at the time the tax becomes a lien on the property shall be considered liable for the real property tax for the real property tax year.

(2) Subdivision (a) shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 1960, but only in the case of sales after December 31, 1960.

(3) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any real property tax, to the extent that the tax was allowable as a deduction under the Bank and Corporation Tax Law of 1954 to the seller for a taxable year which began before January 1, 1961.

(4) In the case of any sale of real property, if the corporation’s net income for the taxable year during
 which the sale occurs is computed under an accrual method of accounting, and if no election under subdivision (b) of Section 24681 (relating to the accrual of real property taxes) applies, then, for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 24345, that portion of the tax that—(A) Is treated, under subdivision (a), as imposed on the corporation; and(B) May not, by reason of the corporation’s method of accounting, be deducted by the corporation for any taxable year,shall be treated as having accrued on the date of the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 129.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24347.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990, all of the following shall apply:

(a) Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to losses. 

(b) Section 166 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to bad debts, except that the deduction of a savings and loan association, bank or financial corporation shall be determined under Section 24348. 

(c) (1) Section 582 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to bad debts, losses, and gains with respect to securities held by financial institutions. 

(2) Section 582(c)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitations on foreign banks, but only to foreign corporations that have in effect for the taxable year a water’s edge election under Section 25110.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 130.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24347.4.

(a) Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to disaster losses, is modified to additionally provide that an appraisal for the purpose of obtaining a loan of federal funds or a loan guarantee from the federal government as a result of a presidentially declared disaster (as defined by Section 1033(h)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code) may be used to establish the amount of any loss described in Section 165(i)(1) or (2) of the Internal Revenue Code to the extent provided in regulations or other guidance of the Secretary of the
 Treasury under Section 165(i)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code (as added by Section 912 of Public Law 105-34).

(b) This section shall apply on and after August 5, 1997.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 7, Sec. 32.   Effective March 14, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

24347.5.

(a) An excess disaster loss, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be carried to other taxable years as provided in subdivision (b), with respect to losses resulting from any of the following disasters:

(1) Forest fire or any other related casualty occurring in 1985 in California.

(2) Storm, flooding, or any other related casualty
 occurring in 1986 in California.

(3) Any loss sustained during 1987 as a result of a forest fire or any other related casualty.

(4) Earthquake, aftershock, or any other related casualty occurring in October 1987 in California.

(5) Earthquake, aftershock, or any other related casualty occurring in October 1989 in California.

(6) Any loss sustained during 1990 as a result of fire or any other related casualty in California.

(7) Any loss sustained as a result of the Oakland/Berkeley Fire of 1991, or any other related casualty.

(8) Any loss sustained as a result of storm, flooding, or any other related casualty occurring in
 February 1992 in California.

(9) Earthquake, aftershock, or any other related casualty occurring in April 1992 in the County of Humboldt.

(10) Riots, arson, or any other related casualty occurring in April or May 1992 in California.

(11) Any loss sustained as a result of the earthquakes or any other related casualty that occurred in the County of San Bernardino in June and July of 1992.

(12) Any loss sustained as a result of the Fountain Fire that occurred in the County of Shasta, or as a result of either of the fires in the Counties of Calaveras and Trinity that occurred in August 1992, or any other related casualty.

(13) Any loss sustained as a result of storm, flooding, or any other
 related casualty that occurred in the Counties of Alpine, Contra Costa, Fresno, Humboldt, Imperial, Lassen, Los Angeles, Madera, Mendocino, Modoc, Monterey, Napa, Orange, Plumas, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, Santa Barbara, Sierra, Siskiyou, Sonoma, Tehama, Trinity, and Tulare, and the City of Fillmore in January 1993.

(14) Any loss sustained as a result of a fire that occurred in the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, and Ventura, during October or November of 1993, or any other related casualty.

(15) Any loss sustained as a result of the earthquake, aftershocks, or any other related casualty that occurred in the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, and Ventura on or after January 17, 1994.

(16) Any loss sustained as a result of a fire that occurred in the County of San Luis
 Obispo during August of 1994, or any other related casualty.

(17) Any loss sustained as a result of the storms or flooding occurring in 1995, or any other related casualty, sustained in any county of this state subject to a disaster declaration with respect to the storms and flooding.

(18) Any loss sustained as a result of the storms or flooding occurring in December 1996 or January 1997, or any related casualty, sustained in any county of this state subject to a disaster declaration with respect to the storms or flooding.

(19) Any loss sustained as a result of the storms or flooding occurring in February 1998, or any related casualty, sustained in any county of this state subject to a disaster declaration with respect to the storms or flooding.

(20) Any loss sustained as a result of a freeze occurring in the winter of 1998–99, or any related casualty, sustained in any county of this state subject to a disaster declaration with respect to the freeze.

(21) Any loss sustained as a result of an earthquake occurring in September 2000, that was included in the Governor’s proclamation of a state of emergency for the County of Napa.

(22) Any loss sustained as a result of the Middle River levee break in San Joaquin County occurring in June 2004.

(23) Any losses sustained as a result of the fires that occurred in the Counties of Los Angeles, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, and Ventura in October and November 2003, or as a result of floods, mudflows, and debris flows, directly related to fires.

(24) Any losses sustained in the Counties of Santa Barbara and San Luis Obispo as a result of the San Simeon earthquake, aftershocks, and any other related casualties.

(25) Any losses sustained as a result of the wildfires that occurred in Shasta County, commencing August 11, 2004, and any other related casualty.

(26) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Kern, Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, Santa Barbara, and Ventura as a result of the severe rainstorms, related flooding and slides, and any other related casualties, that occurred in December 2004, January 2005, February 2005, March 2005, or June 2005.

(27) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Alameda, Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Contra Costa, Del Norte, El Dorado, Fresno, Humboldt, Kings, Lake, Lassen, Madera,
 Marin, Mariposa, Mendocino, Merced, Monterey, Napa, Nevada, Placer, Plumas, Sacramento, San Joaquin, San Luis Obispo, San Mateo, Santa Cruz, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Solano, Sonoma, Stanislaus, Sutter, Trinity, Tulare, Tuolumne, Yolo, and Yuba as a result of the severe rainstorms, related flooding and slides, and any other related casualties, that occurred in December 2005, January 2006, March 2006, or April 2006.

(28) Any loss sustained in the County of San Bernardino as a result of the wildfires that occurred in July 2006.

(29) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Riverside and Ventura as a result of wildfires that occurred during the 2006 calendar year.

(30) Any loss sustained in the Counties of El Dorado, Fresno, Imperial, Kern, Kings, Madera, Merced, Monterey, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, San Luis
 Obispo, Santa Barbara, Santa Clara, Stanislaus, Tulare, Ventura, and Yuba that were the subject of the Governor’s proclamations of a state of emergency for the severe freezing conditions that occurred in January 2007.

(31) Any loss sustained in the County of El Dorado as a result of wildfires that occurred in June 2007.

(32) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Santa Barbara and Ventura as a result of the Zaca Fire that occurred during the 2007 calendar year.

(33) Any loss sustained in the County of Inyo as a result of wildfires that commenced in July 2007.

(34) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, Santa Barbara, and Ventura as a result of wildfires that occurred during the 2007 calendar year
 that were the subject of the Governor’s disaster proclamations of September 15, 2007, and October 21, 2007.

(35) Any loss sustained in the County of Riverside as a result of extremely strong and damaging winds that occurred in October 2007.

(36) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Butte, Kern, Mariposa, Mendocino, Monterey, Plumas, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Shasta, and Trinity as a result of wildfires that occurred in May or June 2008 that were the subject of the Governor’s proclamations of a state of emergency.

(37) Any loss sustained in the County of Santa Barbara as a result of wildfires that occurred in July 2008.

(38) Any loss sustained in the County of Inyo as a result of the severe rainstorms, related flooding and landslides, and any other
 related casualties, that occurred in July 2008.

(39) Any loss sustained in the County of Humboldt as a result of wildfires that commenced in May 2008.

(40) Any loss sustained in the County of Santa Barbara as a result of wildfires that commenced in November 2008. 

(41) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Los Angeles and Ventura as a result of wildfires that commenced in October 2008 or November 2008 that were the subject of the Governor’s proclamations of a state of emergency. 

(42) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Orange, Riverside, and San Bernardino as a result of wildfires that commenced in November 2008.

(43) Any loss sustained in the County of Santa Barbara as a result of
 wildfires that commenced in May 2009. 

(b) (1) In the case of any loss allowed under Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to losses, any excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the five taxable years following the taxable year for which the loss is claimed. However, if there is any excess disaster loss remaining after the five-year period, then the applicable percentage, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 24416, of that excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the next 10 taxable years.

(2) The entire amount of any excess disaster loss as defined in subdivision (c) shall be carried to the earliest of the taxable years to which, by reason of subdivision (b), the loss may be carried. The portion of the loss which shall be carried to each of the other taxable years shall be the excess, if
 any, of the amount of excess disaster loss over the sum of the net income for each of the prior taxable years to which that excess disaster loss is carried.

(c) “Excess disaster loss” means a disaster loss computed pursuant to Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code, which exceeds the net income of the year of loss or, if the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is made, the net income of the year preceding the loss.

(d) The provisions of this section and Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable to any of the losses listed in subdivision (a) sustained in any county or city in this state which was proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster.

(e) Any corporation subject to the provisions of Section 25101 or 25101.15 that has disaster losses pursuant to this
 section, shall determine the excess disaster loss to be carried to other taxable years under the principles specified in Section 25108 relating to net operating losses.

(f) Losses allowable under this section may not be taken into account in computing a net operating loss deduction under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(g) For losses described in paragraphs (15) to (43), inclusive, of subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the return (determined with regard to extension) for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 299, Sec. 3.   (AB 1568)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

24347.6.

(a) An excess disaster loss, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be carried to other taxable years as provided in subdivision (b), with respect to losses sustained in the County of Mendocino as a result of the tsunami that occurred in March 2011.

(b) (1) In the case of any loss allowed under Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to losses, any excess
 disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the five taxable years following the taxable year for which the loss is claimed. However, if there is any excess disaster loss remaining after the five-year period, then the applicable percentage, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 24416, of that excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the next 10 taxable years.

(2) The entire amount of any excess disaster loss as defined in subdivision (c) shall be carried to the earliest of the taxable years to which, by reason of subdivision (b), the loss may be carried. The portion of the loss which shall be carried to each of the other taxable years shall be the excess, if any, of the amount of excess disaster loss over the sum of the net income for each of the prior taxable years to which that excess disaster loss is carried.

(c) “Excess disaster
 loss” means a disaster loss computed pursuant to Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code, which exceeds the net income of the year of loss or, if the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is made, the net income of the year preceding the loss.

(d) This section and Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code apply to any of the losses listed in subdivision (a) sustained in any county or city in this state which was proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster.

(e) A corporation subject to Section 25101 or 25101.15 that has disaster losses pursuant to this section shall determine the excess disaster loss to be carried to other taxable years under the principles specified in Section 25108 relating to net operating losses.

(f) Losses allowable under this section shall not be taken into
 account in computing a net operating loss deduction under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(g) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the return (determined with regard to extension) for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 491.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

24347.7.

(a) An excess disaster loss, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be carried to other taxable years as provided in subdivision (b), with respect to losses sustained in the County of Humboldt as a result of the earthquake that occurred in January 2010. 

(b) (1) In the case of any loss allowed under Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to losses, any excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the five taxable years following the taxable year for which the loss is claimed. However, if there is any excess disaster loss remaining after the five-year period, then the applicable percentage, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 24416, of that excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the next 10 taxable years.

(2) The entire amount of any excess disaster loss as defined in subdivision (c) shall be carried to the earliest of the taxable years to which, by reason of subdivision (b), the loss may be carried. The portion of the loss which shall be carried to each of the other taxable years shall be the excess, if any, of the amount of excess disaster loss over the sum of the net income for each of the prior taxable years to which that excess disaster loss is carried.

(c) “Excess disaster loss” means a disaster loss computed pursuant to Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code, which exceeds the net income of the year of loss or, if the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is made, the net income of the year preceding the loss.

(d) The provisions of this section and Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable to any of the losses listed in subdivision (a) sustained in any county or city in this state which was proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster.

(e) Any corporation subject to the provisions of Section 25101 or 25101.15 that has disaster losses pursuant to this section, shall determine the excess disaster loss to be carried to other taxable years under the principles specified in Section 25108 relating to net operating losses.

(f) Losses allowable under this section may not be taken into account in computing a net operating loss deduction under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(g) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the return (determined with regard to extension) for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 449, Sec. 6.   (AB 1690)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

24347.8.

(a) An excess disaster loss, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be carried to other taxable years as provided in subdivision (b), with respect to losses sustained in the County of Imperial as a result of the earthquake that occurred in April 2010.

(b) (1) In the case of any loss allowed under Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to losses, any excess disaster
 loss shall be carried forward to each of the five taxable years following the taxable year for which the loss is claimed. However, if there is any excess disaster loss remaining after the five-year period, then the applicable percentage, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 24416, of that excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the next 10 taxable years.

(2) The entire amount of any excess disaster loss as defined in subdivision (c) shall be carried to the earliest of the taxable years to which, by reason of subdivision (b), the loss may be carried. The portion of the loss which shall be carried to each of the other taxable years shall be the excess, if any, of the amount of excess disaster loss over the sum of the net income for each of the prior taxable years to which that excess disaster loss is carried.

(c) “Excess disaster loss” means a
 disaster loss computed pursuant to Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code, which exceeds the net income of the year of loss or, if the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is made, the net income of the year preceding the loss.

(d) The provisions of this section and Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable to any of the losses listed in subdivision (a) sustained in any county or city in this state which was proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster.

(e) Any corporation subject to the provisions of Section 25101 or 25101.15 that has disaster losses pursuant to this section, shall determine the excess disaster loss to be carried to other taxable years under the principles specified in Section 25108 relating to net operating losses.

(f) Losses allowable under
 this section may not be taken into account in computing a net operating loss deduction under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(g) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the return (determined with regard to extension) for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 461, Sec. 7.   (AB 2136)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

24347.9.

(a) An excess disaster loss, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be carried to other taxable years as provided in subdivision (b), with respect to losses resulting from any of the following disasters:

(1) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Los Angeles and Monterey as a result of wildfires that commenced in August 2009.

(2) Any
 loss sustained in the County of Placer as a result of wildfires that commenced in August 2009. 

(3) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Calaveras, Imperial, Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Francisco, and Siskiyou as a result of winter storms that commenced in January 2010. 

(4) Any loss sustained in the County of Kern as a result of the wildfires that commenced in July 2010. 

(b) (1) In the case of any loss allowed under Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to losses, any excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the five taxable years following the taxable year for which the loss is claimed. However, if there is any excess disaster loss remaining after the five-year period, then the applicable percentage, as set forth in paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (b) of Section 24416, of that excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the next 10 taxable years.

(2) The entire amount of any excess disaster loss as defined in subdivision (c) shall be carried to the earliest of the taxable years to which, by reason of subdivision (b), the loss may be carried. The portion of the loss which shall be carried to each of the other taxable years shall be the excess, if any, of the amount of excess disaster loss over the sum of the net income for each of the prior taxable years to which that excess disaster loss is carried.

(c) “Excess disaster loss” means a disaster loss computed pursuant to Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code, which exceeds the net income of the year of loss or, if the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is made, the net income of the year preceding the loss.

(d) The provisions of this section and Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable to any of the losses listed in subdivision (a) sustained in any county or city in this state which was proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster.

(e) Any corporation subject to the provisions of Section 25101 or 25101.15 that has disaster losses pursuant to this section, shall determine the excess disaster loss to be carried to other taxable years under the principles specified in Section 25108 relating to net operating losses.

(f) Losses allowable under this section may not be taken into account in computing a net operating loss deduction under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(g) For losses described in subdivision (a), the
 election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the return (determined with regard to extension) for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 447, Sec. 6.   (AB 1662)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

24347.10.

(a) An excess disaster loss, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be carried to other taxable years as provided in subdivision (b), with respect to losses sustained in the County of San Mateo as a result of the explosion and fire that occurred in September 2010.

(b) (1) In the case of any loss allowed under Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to losses,
 any excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the five taxable years following the taxable year for which the loss is claimed. However, if there is any excess disaster loss remaining after the five-year period, then the applicable percentage, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 24416, of that excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the next 10 taxable years.

(2) The entire amount of any excess disaster loss as defined in subdivision (c) shall be carried to the earliest of the taxable years to which, by reason of subdivision (b), the loss may be carried. The portion of the loss which shall be carried to each of the other taxable years shall be the excess, if any, of the amount of excess disaster loss over the sum of the net income for each of the prior taxable years to which that excess disaster loss is carried.

(c) “Excess
 disaster loss” means a disaster loss computed pursuant to Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code, which exceeds the net income of the year of loss or, if the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is made, the net income of the year preceding the loss.

(d) This section and Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code apply to any of the losses listed in subdivision (a) sustained in any county or city in this state which was proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster.

(e) A corporation subject to Section 25101 or 25101.15 that has disaster losses pursuant to this section shall determine the excess disaster loss to be carried to other taxable years under the principles specified in Section 25108 relating to net operating losses.

(f) Losses allowable under this section shall not be
 taken into account in computing a net operating loss deduction under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code.
